Washington statutes.
RCW 4.18.010

Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1) "Claim" means a right of action that may be asserted in a civil action or proceeding and includes a right of action created by statute.

(2) "State" means a state, commonwealth, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, a foreign country, or a political subdivision of any of them.

[ 1983 c 152 s 1.]